Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1584.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 150.28b, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 130, O.S.L. 2023 (74 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 150.28b), is amended to read as follows:
Section 150.28b. A. All accredited crime laboratories in the
State of Oklahoma must this state shall supply to all law
enforcement agencies the same standardized sexual assault evidence
kit for the collection of DNA or other evidence as a result of an
alleged crime of sexual assault.
B. A sexual assault evidence kit, or other DNA evidence if a
kit is not collected, must be submitted to the appropriate
accredited crime laboratory for forensic testing within twenty (20)
ten (10) days after receipt of the evidence by a law enforcement
agency if a report of the sexual assault is made to the law
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1584 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

enfo rcement agency, unless the victim requests that the sexual
assault evidence kit not be tested.
C. If, at the time the forensic medical examination is
conducted, a report of the sexual assault is not made or if the
victim requests that the sexual assault evidence kit not be tested,
the medical provider shall inform the victim in writing of his or
her right to request the testing of the sexual assault evidence kit
at any future time. The law enforcement agency shall submit the
sexual assault evidence kit to the appropriate accredited crime
laboratory for forensic testing within twenty (20) ten (10) days of
such request. However, nothing in this subsection shall negate the
responsibility of a medical provider to report a suspected sexual
assault as provided for in Section 40.3A of Title 22 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
D. A collected sexual assault evidence kit, whether tested or
untested, must be retained in a secure, environmentally safe manner
for not less than fifty (50) years or for the length of the statute
of limitations for the alleged crime, whichever is longer.
E. Each law enforcement agency is responsible for the
maintenance and storage of untested kits either in their own
evidence storage or through an agreement with another agency with
larger capacity.
F. By January 1, 2020, the The Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation (OSBI) and each accredited crime laboratory, in
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1584 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

coor dination with Oklahoma the Sexual Assault Forensic Evidence Task
Force (SAFE) Board, shall adopt and disseminate guidelines and
procedures for the collection, submission, and testing of DNA
evidence that is obtained in connection with an alleged sexual
assault. A collected sexual assault evidence kit collected on or
after the effective date of this act shall be processed by the
appropriate accredited crime laboratory to which it was submitted
within thirty (30) days after receipt of the sexual assault evidence
kit. Priority testing shall be given for sexual assault evidence
kits that will yield evidentiary value to the investigation and
prosecution of the alleged sexual assault.
G. The OSBI may inquire as to the condition and location of a
sexual assault evidence kit that has not been submitted to a
forensic laboratory within the deadlines established in subsection B
of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS
March 4, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED







SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1584 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)